Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-170
Adjacent territory; regulation; statutes and ordinances; highest standard required by either to govern.

Whenever the regulations made under authority of sections 23-164 to 23-174 require a greater width or size of yard, courts or other open spaces, or require a lower height of building or a less number of stories or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied or impose other higher standards than are required in any other statute or local ordinance or regulation, the provisions of the regulations made under authority of said sections shall govern. Wherever the provisions of any other statute or local ordinance or regulation require a greater width or size of yards, courts, or other open space or require a lower height of building or a less number of stories or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied or impose other higher standards than are required by the regulations made under authority of said sections, the provisions of such statute or local ordinance or regulations shall govern.

Laws 1941, c. 131, § 18, p. 514;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-158;

R.S.1943, § 23-170.